New Jersey, session 222, S3622.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.40:27-1 is amended to read as follows: The board of [chosen freeholders] county commissioners may create a county planning board of not less than five nor more than nine members.  The members of [such] the planning board shall be the director of the board of [chosen freeholders] county commissioners, or a designee, one member of the board of [chosen freeholders] county commissioners, to be appointed by the director, the county engineer, if the board exceed six in number, and other citizens who may not hold any other county office and who shall be appointed by [such] the director of the  board of [chosen freeholders] county commissioners with the approval of that body.  One of the remaining members shall be appointed for two years, two shall be appointed for three years, and all additional remaining members shall be appointed for four years, and thereafter their successors shall be appointed for the term of three years from and after the expiration of the terms of their predecessors in office.  All members of the county planning board shall serve [as such] without compensation, but may be paid expenses incurred in the performance of duties. (cf: R.S.40:27-1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Under current law, if a board of county commissioners creates a county planning board, the director of the board of county commissioners (director) is required to serve as a member of that county planning board.  This bill amends the law to authorize the director to appoint a designee to serve on the county planning board. The bill also makes technical corrections to the law.